Louisiana, session 2026, HB1047.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 23:1203.1(J)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1203.1. Definitions; medical treatment schedule; medical advisory council
* * *
J.(1) After a medical provider has submitted to the payor the request for
authorization and the information required by the Louisiana Administrative Code,
Title 40, Chapter 27, the payor shall notify the medical provider of their action on
the request within five business days of receipt of the request. If any dispute arises
after January 1, 2011, as to whether the recommended care, services, or treatment is
in accordance with the medical treatment schedule, or whether a variance from the
medical treatment schedule is reasonably required as contemplated in Subsection I
of this Section, any aggrieved party shall file, within fifteen calendar days, an appeal
with the office of workers' compensation administration medical director or associate
medical director on a form promulgated by the assistant secretary. The medical
director or associate medical director shall render a decision as soon as is practicable,
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2585 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1047
but in no event, not more than thirty calendar days from the date of filing. This
Subsection shall not apply to requests for authorizations for prescription drugs.
* * *